Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.601

School district bonds—Redemption—Facilities under administration of college district board.

If a school board has contracted to redeem general obligation bonds used for the construction or acquisition of facilities which are now to be under the administration, control, and occupancy of the college district board, the school board shall continue to redeem the bonds in accordance with the provisions of the bonds.

[ 1991 c 238 s 138.]